Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.825

Code city retaining former second-class city plan—Street commissioner.

In a city initially classified as a second-class city prior to January 1, 1993, that retained its second-class city plan of government when the city reorganized as a noncharter code city, the street commissioner shall be under the direction of the mayor and city council shall have control of the streets and public places of the city and shall perform such duties as the city council may prescribe.

[ 1994 c 81 s 29; 1965 c 7 s 35.23.160. Prior: 1907 c 241 s 23; RRS s 9028. Formerly RCW 35.23.160.]